Illinois, session 104th, SB3693.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Clean 5Transportation Standard Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) The transportation sector in this State is a 8    leading source of criteria air pollutants and greenhouse 9    gas emissions, which collectively endanger public health 10    and welfare by causing and contributing to increased air 11    pollution and climate change. 12        (2) Shifting from petroleum-based transportation fuels 13    to alternative fuels has the potential to significantly 14    reduce transportation emissions of air pollutants and 15    greenhouse gases and is recommended by the 16    Intergovernmental Panel on Climate Change as an important 17    pathway for holding global warming at 1.5 degrees Celsius. 18    A clean transportation standard would promote innovation 19    in, and production and use of, nonpetroleum fuels that 20    reduce vehicle-related and fuel-related air pollution that 21    endangers public health and welfare and disproportionately 22    impacts disadvantaged communities. 23        (3) Credits generated through the use of clean fuel   SB3693- 2 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    under this Act will promote innovation and investment in 2    clean fuels. 3        (4) Some of the most fertile soils in the world are 4    found in the State, with the State boasting the productive 5    silty clay loam soil, and with a majority of the cropland 6    in the State being considered prime farmland.7        (5) State fertile soils, however, are subject to 8    ongoing degradation as soil erosion has contributed to the 9    loss of fertile topsoil we need to grow crops.10        (6) Sustainable agriculture can be used to restore the 11    State's degraded soils to counteract loss of topsoil in 12    recent years.13        (7) An agricultural credit program will work to 14    restore degraded soils and to produce soil health benefits 15    accrued to the people of the State. 16    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:17    "Advance credits" refers to credits advanced under this 18Act for actions that will result in real reductions of the 19carbon intensity of the State's transportation fuels.20    "Agency" means the Environmental Protection Agency.21    "Aggregator" or "credit aggregator" means any party other 22than a deficit generator that offers to purchase credits from 23one or more credit generators or on-farm credit generators for 24resale to deficit generators.25    "Alternative compliance credit" means a credit made   SB3693- 3 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1available at the price cap for compliance purposes and in 2accordance with the provisions of paragraphs (4) and (5) of 3subsection (a) of Section 20.4    "Automatic adjustment mechanism" means a mechanism which 5advances all subsequent annual carbon intensity standards by 6one year or reduces all subsequent annual carbon intensity 7standards by 50% when conditions are met as specified in 8Section 20.9    "Aviation fuel" means a fuel suitably blended to be used 10in aviation engines. 11    "Backstop aggregator" means a qualified nonprofit entity 12approved by the Agency to aggregate credits for electricity 13used as a transportation fuel when those credits would not 14otherwise be generated.15    "Board" means the Pollution Control Board.16    "Carbon intensity" means the amount of life cycle 17greenhouse gas emissions per unit of fuel energy expressed in 18grams of carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule. 19    "Clean fuel" means a transportation fuel that is 20domestically produced and has a carbon intensity below the 21clean transportation standard carbon intensity standard in a 22given year. 23    "Clean transportation standard" means the standard adopted 24by the Board under Section 15 for the reduction, on average, of 25life cycle carbon intensity of fuels used for on-road 26transportation.  SB3693- 4 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    "Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers" or "CPI-U" 2means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 3the United States Department of Labor that measures the 4average change in prices of goods and services, United States 5city average, all items.6    "Credit" means a unit of measure generated when clean fuel 7is provided for use in this State, such that one credit is 8equal to one metric ton of carbon dioxide equivalent. 9    "Credit generator" means an individual or entity, other 10than an on-farm credit generator, that has registered, on a 11mandatory or permissive basis, to participate in the clean 12transportation standard and generates a credit.13    "Committee" means the Clean Transportation Standard 14Agricultural Committee created under Section 20.15    "Deficit" means a unit of measure generated when a fuel 16provided in this State has a carbon intensity that exceeds the 17clean transportation standard for the applicable year, 18expressed in metric tons of carbon dioxide equivalent. 19    "Deficit generator" means an individual or entity that has 20registered, on a mandatory or permissive basis, to participate 21in the clean transportation standard and generates a deficit.22    "Fuel" means any one or more of the following that is used 23to power vehicles or equipment for the purpose of 24transportation: electricity or a liquid, gaseous, or blended 25fuel, including gasoline, diesel, liquefied petroleum gas, 26natural gas, or hydrogen.   SB3693- 5 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    "Fuel pathway" means a detailed description of all stages 2of a transportation fuel's production and use, including 3feedstock growth, extraction, processing, transportation, 4distribution, and combustion or use by an end user. 5    "Life cycle carbon intensity" means the quantity of 6greenhouse gas emissions per unit of energy, expressed in 7carbon dioxide equivalent per megajoule, emitted by the fuel, 8including both direct and indirect sources, as calculated by 9the Agency under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Section 20 10using the methods described under Section 30. 11    "Military tactical vehicle" means a motor vehicle owned by 12the U.S. Department of Defense or the U.S. military services 13and used in combat, combat support, combat service support, 14tactical or relief operations, or training for such 15operations. 16    "On-farm credit generator" means the person who has 17registered on a permissive basis and assumes the variable cost 18and risk of on-farm best practices and standards that 19generates credits and implements those practices on acreage in 20the State.21    "Petroleum-only portion" means the component of gasoline 22or diesel fuel before blending with ethanol, biodiesel, 23biofuel, or other clean fuel. 24    "Provider" means: 25        (1) with respect to any liquid fuel, hydrogen fuel, 26    and renewable propane used as a fuel source for   SB3693- 6 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    transportation, the person who refines, produces, or 2    imports the fuel;3        (2) with respect to any biomethane, the person who 4    imports or produces, refines, treats, or otherwise 5    processes biogas into biomethane used as a fuel source for 6    transportation; 7        (3) with respect to electricity used as a fuel source 8    for transportation, the person who is the direct provider 9    of electricity, the electric vehicle charging service 10    provider, the electric utility, the electric vehicle fleet 11    operator, the electric vehicle manufacturer, and the 12    owners or operators of charging stations located on 13    commercial property; or14        (4) with respect to other types of fuel, a person 15    determined to be the provider by the Agency.16    "Provider" does not include the owner or operator of a 17residential charging station.18    "Sustainable aviation fuel" means an aviation fuel with a 19carbon intensity sufficient to generate credits under the 20clean transportation standard upon its production or supply. 21    "Tactical support equipment" means equipment using a 22portable engine, including turbines, that meets military 23specifications, is owned by the U.S. Department of Defense or 24the U.S. military services or its allies, and is used in 25combat, combat support, combat service support, tactical or 26relief operations, or training for such operations. "Tactical   SB3693- 7 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1support equipment" includes, but is not limited to, engines 2associated with portable generators, aircraft start carts, 3heaters, and lighting carts.  4    Section 15. Rulemaking, implementation, and baseline 5calculations for clean transportation standard. 6    (a) To the extent allowed by federal law, within 24 months 7after the effective date of this Act, the Agency shall propose 8and the Board shall adopt rules in accordance with Section 20 9establishing a clean transportation standard in order to 10reduce, after a 12-month implementation period for a clean 11transportation standard, within 10 years of the adoption of 12the Agency's rules by the Board, the life cycle carbon 13intensity of fuels for the ground transportation sector by 25% 14below the 2019 baseline level as calculated under this 15Section. Immediately after rules establishing a clean 16transportation standard are adopted by the Board, the Agency 17shall open a 12-month implementation period for credit 18generators, deficit generators, and on-farm credit generators 19to register in the clean transportation standard as required 20under this Act and in accordance with the adopted rules. All 21entities must be in compliance with the rules by the end of the 22second year after the effective date of this Act. After the 25% 23reduction described in this Section is attained, the Agency 24shall prepare a report that proposes further reductions in the 25life cycle carbon intensity of fuels for the ground   SB3693- 8 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1transportation sector for the following 10 years. The report 2prepared by the Agency shall include proposed changes to this 3Act that are required to implement those reductions. The rules 4proposed and adopted shall be subject to public notice and 5comment under the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. The 6Board may recommend to the General Assembly reductions to the 7clean transportation standard below those adopted in 8accordance with this Act, using factors, including, but not 9limited to, advances in clean fuel technology. The rules 10adopted by the Board under this Section shall include fees for 11the registration of credit generators, deficit generators, and 12on-farm credit generators to offset the costs incurred by the 13Board and the Agency that are associated with implementing the 14clean transportation standard. These fees shall be used only 15in connection with the administration of clean transportation 16standards and may be levied differently for credit generators, 17deficit generators, and on-farm credit generators. 18    (b) Prior to proposing the rules establishing the clean 19transportation standard, the Agency shall solicit feedback 20from and consult with the Clean Transportation Standard 21Advisory Council made up of the following members, to be 22appointed within 90 days after the effective date of this Act 23by the Governor, in consultation with the President of the 24Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the 25Minority Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the 26House of Representatives, as follows: one representative from   SB3693- 9 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1the fuel production industry; one representative from the 2renewable fuel industry; one representative from the 3transportation industry; one representative from the State's 4largest general farm organization; one representative from an 5organization representing the State's largest feedstock used 6for biofuel production; one representative from an 7environmental advocacy organization; one representative from 8an organization representing utilities and power generation 9companies; one representative of a labor organization; one 10representative from an impacted environmental justice 11community, as defined in Section 801-10 of the Illinois 12Finance Authority Act; one representative from the Department 13of Agriculture; and one representative from the Department of 14Transportation. The Clean Transportation Standard Advisory 15Council shall meet at least once every 6 months with the Agency 16during the development of clean transportation standard rules. 17The Agency shall include or address the feedback received from 18the advisory committee in the proposed rules.19    (c) The Agency shall calculate the baseline carbon 20intensities of the petroleum-only portion of all 21transportation fuels produced or imported in 2019 for use in 22this State by, in accordance with Section 30: 23        (1) reviewing and considering the best available 24    applicable scientific data and calculations; and25        (2) using a life cycle emissions, performance-based 26    approach that is technology-and-feedstock neutral.   SB3693- 10 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    (d) The Agency shall calculate the life cycle emissions of 2nonpetroleum portions of transportation fuels in accordance 3with Section 30. 4    Section 20. Contents of clean transportation standard; the 5Clean Transportation Standard Agricultural Committee. 6    (a) The clean transportation standard adopted by the 7Board, by rule, shall:8        (1) apply to all providers in the State; 9        (2) be measured based on a life cycle carbon intensity 10    that shall be calculated by the Agency in accordance with 11    Section 30;12        (3) recognize voluntary farm emissions reductions that 13    contribute to the reduced carbon intensity of fuels by 14    allowing credit generators to use individualized 15    farm-level carbon intensity scoring for approved 16    sustainable agricultural practices and by requiring the 17    Agency to use the GREET model's Feedstock Carbon Intensity 18    Calculator (FD-CIC) to determine individualized farm-level 19    carbon intensity scoring; 20        (4) include a credit price cap that is to be 21    established by the Agency and published by the Board using 22    the trailing 24-month average price of credits available 23    in 2 of the 3 highest value markets with comparable, 24    technology-neutral clean transportation standards;25        (5) ensure compliance with the price cap in paragraph   SB3693- 11 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    (4) by (i) requiring evidence of an unfulfilled public 2    tender for credit purchase at the cap price by any party 3    claiming an inability to acquire credits needed for 4    compliance, (ii) establishing a facility for the Agency or 5    a designated nonprofit entity to sell alternative 6    compliance credits at the cap price value plus one 7    percent, and (iii) creating an approved list of uses for 8    revenue from the sale of alternative compliance credits 9    that increase access to and use of credit generating fuels 10    produced from in-state resources and on-farm credit 11    generating activities;12        (6) contain a structure for compliance that conforms 13    with the marketplace system described in Section 25, 14    including, but not limited to, details, such as:15            (A) methods for assigning compliance obligations 16        and methods for tracking tradable credits;17            (B) mechanisms that allow credits to be traded, 18        transferred, sold, and banked for future compliance 19        periods;20            (C) mechanisms that provide for the creation of a 21        list of accepted credit transactions and a list of 22        prohibited forms of credit transactions, which may 23        include trades involving, related to, or associated 24        with any of the following:25                (i) any manipulative or deceptive device;26                (ii) a corner or an attempt to corner the   SB3693- 12 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1            market for credits;2                (iii) fraud or an attempt to defraud any other 3            entity;4                (iv) false, misleading, or inaccurate reports 5            concerning information or conditions that affect 6            or tend to affect the price of a credit; and 7                (v) applications, reports, statements, or 8            documents required to be filed under this Act that 9            are false or misleading with respect to a material 10            fact or that omit a material fact necessary to 11            make the contents therein not misleading;12            This subparagraph may not prohibit the voluntary 13        sale of credits by credit generators to any party 14        otherwise acting in compliance with this Act. Credits 15        generated outside of the clean transportation standard 16        established under this Act shall be ineligible for 17        sale or purchase for compliance purposes required 18        under this Act;19            (D) procedures for verifying the validity of 20        credits and deficits generated under the clean 21        transportation standard;22            (E) mechanisms by which persons associated with 23        the supply chains of transportation fuels that are 24        used for purposes that are exempt from the clean 25        transportation standard described in Section 40 and 26        persons that are associated with the supply chains of   SB3693- 13 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1        transportation fuels and will generate credits may 2        register with the Agency to participate in the clean 3        transportation standards; and4            (F) an administrative procedure by which a deficit 5        generator may contest the Board's or Agency's 6        calculation prior to the levying of a penalty for 7        failure to remedy a given deficit; and8            (G) procedures that will allow the Agency to 9        cancel or reverse (i) a credit transfer that is 10        determined to be a prohibited transaction under items 11        (i) through (v) of subparagraph (B) or (ii) any other 12        prohibited transaction as determined by the Board in 13        rulemaking;14        (7) contain a clean transportation standards review 15    procedure whereby the Board or Agency shall, every 2 years 16    after the implementation period for the clean 17    transportation standard ends, solicit feedback from and 18    consult with the advisory council established in 19    subsection (b); the substance of the consultations shall 20    include, but may not be limited to, a review of the 21    economic impact of the clean transportation standard, 22    whether the clean transportation standard is adhering to 23    the established carbon intensity reduction goals, the 24    health impact of the emissions reductions on disadvantaged 25    environmental justice communities, as defined in Section 26    801-10 of the Illinois Finance Authority Act, and whether   SB3693- 14 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    access to transportation has been affected as a result of 2    the implementation of the clean transportation standard;3        (8) include annual carbon intensity reduction 4    standards that are to be met by deficit generators and 5    that result in the attainment of carbon intensity 6    reduction targets set by the Board;7        (9) maximize benefits to the environment and natural 8    resources and develop safeguards and incentives to protect 9    natural lands and enhance environmental integrity, 10    including biodiversity;11        (10) aim to support, through credit generation or 12    other financial means, voluntary farmer-led efforts to 13    adopt agricultural practices that benefit soil health and 14    water quality;15        (11) support equitable transportation electrification 16    that benefits all communities and is powered primarily 17    with low-carbon and carbon-free electricity;18        (12) seek to improve air quality and public health, 19    targeting communities that bear a disproportionate health 20    burden from transportation pollution; 21        (13) establish, in consultation with the Department of 22    Agriculture and the Department of Transportation, a 23    procedure for determining fuel pathways that:24            (A) is consistent with Section 25;25            (B) is consistent for all fuel types;26            (C) is based on science and engineering; and  SB3693- 15 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1            (D) accounts for any on-site additional energy use 2        by a carbon capture technology employed in the fuel 3        production process, including, but not limited to, 4        generation, distillation, and compression;5        (14) contain mechanisms to excuse noncompliance from 6    enforcement action if compliance is impossible, including 7    rules that shall specify the criteria and procedures for 8    the Agency to determine whether a period of noncompliance 9    is excusable in accordance with Sections 50 and 55;10        (15) include mechanisms by which providers who would 11    be eligible to generate credits from electricity used as 12    transportation fuel may assign their right to generate 13    credits to an aggregator, and include mechanisms by which 14    a backstop aggregator may register to generate credits if 15    an electric utility opts out of the clean transportation 16    standards;17        (16) provide indirect accounting mechanisms, such as 18    book-and-claim or mass-balancing for clean fuels entering 19    fungible supply systems that can access this State; and20        (17) contain an automatic adjustment mechanism that 21    shall be implemented no earlier than the third compliance 22    period after rules establishing a clean transportation 23    standard are adopted by the Board, with the intention to 24    provide adjustments to the carbon intensity reduction 25    standards during periods of sustained and significant 26    overperformance or underperformance.  SB3693- 16 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1        As used in this paragraph:2        "Overperformance" means when the total number of 3    credits in the credit bank exceeds the total number of 4    deficits generated during the prior 4 consecutive quarters 5    by 150%, and the total number of credits generated during 6    the prior 4 consecutive quarters exceeds the total number 7    of deficits generated during the prior 4 consecutive 8    quarters.9        "Underperformance" means when the total number of 10    credits in the credit bank is less than 20% of the total 11    number of deficits generated during the prior 4 12    consecutive quarters, and the total number of credits 13    generated during the prior 4 consecutive quarters is less 14    than the total number of deficits generated during the 15    prior 4 consecutive quarters.16            (A) An adjustment mechanism cannot be implemented:17                (i) prior to 4 consecutive quarters of being 18            last triggered; or19                (ii) within 2 compliance periods if the annual 20            carbon intensity standard was adjusted as part of 21            a clean transportation standards review.22            (B) Starting the first quarter of the second 23        compliance period, and every quarter thereafter, the 24        Agency shall announce whether the conditions of this 25        paragraph have been met for that quarter and the 26        cumulative number of quarters that the conditions have   SB3693- 17 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1        been met. This announcement will take place on 2        February 15, May 15, August 15, and November 15 of each 3        year.4            (C) If the conditions in this subsection have been 5        met, the Agency shall post updated annual carbon 6        intensity standards on the Agency's website on May 15, 7        following the announcement that the automatic 8        adjustment mechanism has been triggered.9                (i) If there is a period of sustained and 10            significant overperformance and the conditions in 11            item (i) of subparagraph (A) have been met, all 12            annual carbon intensity standards shall be 13            advanced by one year.14                (ii) If there is a period of sustained and 15            significant underperformance and the conditions in 16            item (ii) of subparagraph (A) have been met, all 17            annual carbon intensity standards shall be reduced 18            by 50% of the annual carbon intensity standards.19                (iii) The updated annual carbon intensity 20            standards shall replace the prior annual carbon 21            intensity standards and shall take effect at the 22            beginning of the compliance period after the 23            Agency posted the updated annual carbon intensity 24            standards on the Agency's website.25    (b) The rules adopted by the Board shall include 26provisions enabling the generation of credits by on-farm   SB3693- 18 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1credit generators that produce feedstocks.2        (1) The rules shall establish a process for on-farm 3    credit generation that:4            (A) is pragmatic and informed by actual farming 5        operations and recordkeeping practices;6            (B) minimizes costs and operational burdens for 7        participating farmers;8            (C) ensures accuracy in GHG emission reduction 9        claims by utilizing the GREET model's Feedstock Carbon 10        Intensity Calculator (FD-CIC) to determine carbon 11        intensity scoring;12            (D) provides fair opportunity for farmer 13        participation in market activities as credit sellers;14            (E) is updated every 2 years to reflect the 15        continuous improvement in optimizing low-cost, 16        efficient accounting practices that deliver high 17        integrity results;18            (F) ensures the Agency shall protect farm data by 19        ensuring farmer ownership of data for a specified 20        amount of time or a period negotiated and agreed to by 21        the farmers on an annual basis; and22            (G) uses a verification process that is in 23        compliance with and does not exceed subsection (c) of 24        Section 25.25        (2) The Department of Agriculture shall maintain a 26    public list of best practices and approved accounting   SB3693- 19 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    methods reflecting the Committee's recommendations.2            (A) The Department of Agriculture shall publish 3        and certify an initial list immediately after rules 4        establishing a clean transportation standard are 5        adopted by the Board.6            (B) The Department of Agriculture shall publish 7        and certify an updated list no later than June 1 in the 8        second year after the completion of the implementation 9        period for the clean transportation standard and by 10        June 1 every 2 years thereafter to reflect improving 11        and evolving methods of on-farm greenhouse gas 12        accounting practices.13        (3) Within 90 days after the effective date of this 14    Act, the Director of the Department of Agriculture, in 15    consultation with the Agency, shall appoint and facilitate 16    the Clean Transportation Standard Agricultural Committee 17    for the purpose of making and updating recommendations of 18    best practices to enable the implementation of on-farm 19    crediting and accounting practices.20            (A) The Committee shall consist of the following 21        members:22                (i) the Director of Agriculture or a 23            designated appointee from the Department of 24            Agriculture;25                (ii) a State Natural Resources Conservation 26            Service agronomist;  SB3693- 20 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1                (iii) a member from the State's largest farm 2            organization;3                (iv) a member from the organization that 4            represents the State's largest feedstock used for 5            biofuel production;6                (v) a member from the organization that 7            represents the State's second largest feedstock 8            used for biofuel production;9                (vi) a certified crop advisor with cover crop 10            expertise;11                (vii) an extension specialist with row crop 12            production credentials;13                (viii) a specialist in the GREET model and 14            life cycle analysis;15                (ix) 2 representatives of organizations 16            representing conservation or environmental 17            interests that work on climate smart agriculture 18            with farmers; and19                (x) a University of Illinois, College of 20            Agriculture, Consumer, and Environmental Sciences 21            economist specializing in row crop production 22            practices.23            (B) The Committee shall:24                (i) develop a list of best practices and 25            standards that are considered for greenhouse gas 26            and carbon reduction and ensure that technical   SB3693- 21 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1            experts from the field evaluate the greenhouse gas 2            and carbon benefit of those practices to 3            understand how they will be conducted on-farm;4                (ii) evaluate different ecosystem service 5            market mechanisms and clean transportation 6            standards frameworks to ensure transparency of the 7            value generated by the greenhouse gas and carbon 8            reduction practices;9                (iii) establish minimum criteria for a 10            contractual definition of fair market value to be 11            used by credit aggregators seeking to acquire 12            credits from on-farm credit generators and ensure 13            the value of credits reflects the improving and 14            evolving practices to improve on-farm greenhouse 15            gas and carbon reductions and is equitable to 16            credit generators and buyers in accordance with 17            the risk and level of effort assumed by each 18            party; and19                (iv) meet at least twice a year to evaluate 20            and propose recommendations of best practices and 21            standards for approval of the Director of 22            Agriculture.23    (c) Rules developed by the Board shall ensure that:24        (1) credits shall be based on annual submissions 25    reported in accordance with methods approved by the 26    Director of Agriculture;  SB3693- 22 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1        (2) on-farm credit generators will receive one credit 2    for every metric ton of greenhouse gas emission reduction 3    or removal;4        (3) credits will be awarded to or owned by the on-farm 5    credit generator that submitted a compliant report of 6    on-farm practices for the prior 12-month period;7        (4) credit holders will have full property rights to 8    hold, sell, or assign credits without restriction;9        (5) credits accumulated by regulated fuel producers 10    will be accepted by the Board for the purpose of 11    demonstrating compliance with clean transportation 12    standards;13        (6) third-party credit aggregators may purchase 14    on-farm credits from one or more on-farm credit generator, 15    as long as purchasing agreements do not violate minimum 16    requirements for ensuring fair market value as established 17    by the Director of Agriculture after consultation with the 18    Committee;19        (7) entities may purchase or otherwise acquire credits 20    from on-farm credit generators for the purpose of 21    demonstrating compliance with regulatory or voluntary 22    standards other than the clean transportation standards, 23    such as the voluntarily established corporate greenhouse 24    gas reduction targets; and25        (8) upon request, the Board will provide certification 26    confirmation that on-farm practices were generated and   SB3693- 23 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    documented according to the practices recommended by the 2    Committee and approved by the Director of Agriculture. 3    (d) All advance credits must represent actual reductions 4of greenhouse gas emissions against the clean transportation 5standards. Vehicles must be registered in the State to be 6eligible to earn advance credits.7    Entities involved with zero-emission vehicles have the 8ability to generate advance credits. 9    On-farm credit generators shall be subject to an annual 10registration fee of $50.11    (e) Imports that have a high risk of deforestation and 12other environmental concerns, such as, but not limited to, 13palm oil, are prohibited. 14    Section 25. Credit market; verification and data privacy; 15compliance and penalties. 16    (a) The clean transportation standard adopted by the Board 17shall take the form of a credit marketplace with the following 18structure. The marketplace shall consist of a system of 19credits and deficits monitored by the Agency. The Agency shall 20compile a list of fuel pathways that providers may use to 21generate credits. Providers seeking to be credit generators 22must register with the Agency and attest to the transportation 23fuels they provide in the State in order to qualify to generate 24credits. Each deficit generator must register and comply with 25the clean transportation standards. Fuels that are registered   SB3693- 24 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1must have a dedicated, verifiable fuel pathway with a carbon 2intensity score measurable by software described in Section 30 3and assigned a unique identifier by the Agency. Providers 4reaching or exceeding the required reduction of life cycle 5carbon intensity under the clean transportation standard shall 6receive credits from the Agency upon verification described in 7subsection (c) at the end of a reoccurring reporting period as 8determined by the Agency. Fuel providers that are deficit 9generators during a year shall eliminate the deficit by either 10providing transportation fuels whose carbon intensity is at or 11below the level of that year's annual clean transportation 12standard or by purchasing credits to offset the deficit. The 13system of credits created under this subsection shall provide 14credits based on a life cycle emissions performance-based 15approach that is technology neutral, feedstock neutral, and 16has the purpose of achieving transportation fuel 17decarbonization. 18    (b) In compiling the list of fuel pathways authorized in 19subsection (a) the Agency must create an initial pathway list 20and identify procedures for modifying existing pathways or 21adding new pathways providers may use to generate credits. All 22listed pathways must have a carbon intensity calculated in 23accordance with Section 30.24        (1) The Agency must, as part of its initial rules, 25    provide a list of pathways that providers may use to 26    generate credits. The list must include pathways that have   SB3693- 25 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    a carbon intensity calculated in accordance with Section 2    30 and are already approved for use in comparable and 3    technology-neutral clean fuel programs established by any 4    other jurisdiction in North America.5        (2) Any provider may request approval of a 6    modification to an existing pathway or approval of a new 7    pathway. Such requests must be accompanied by 8    documentation identified by the Agency as appropriate to 9    review such requests, including third-party validation of 10    the submitted materials and carbon intensity calculations. 11    The Agency shall have 60 days to review and respond to any 12    pathway requests submitted in compliance with all 13    documentation requirements. The Agency may request 14    additional documentation as appropriate for any new 15    pathway approval requests by providing a written 16    explanation of any documentation deficiencies to the 17    provider. A request for additional documentation shall 18    pause the 60 days to review the pathway request until the 19    provider submits the requested documentation. Upon 20    submittal of the requested documentation by the provider, 21    the Agency must review and respond to the request within 22    the days remaining from the 60 days to review at the time 23    the request for additional documentation was made by the 24    Agency. The Agency shall approve a pathway request in 25    compliance with all documentation requirements set forth 26    by this Section. In the absence of a decision by the Agency   SB3693- 26 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    within the 60-day deadline, the request shall be deemed 2    approved. If the Agency denies a pathway request, it must 3    provide a written explanation of the reasons for the 4    denial to the provider.5    (c) The Agency must, in collaboration with the Department 6of Agriculture and the Department of Transportation, establish 7acceptable methods to verify compliance with the clean 8transportation standard as required under this Act. Upon 9registering, credit generators, deficit generators, or on-farm 10credit generators must agree to provide data related to the 11registered fuel pathway used to generate credits or deficits 12with the Agency as required to administer the clean 13transportation standards. Upon registering, credit generators, 14deficit generators, or on-farm credit generators must agree to 15be subject to periodic audits as determined by the Agency. The 16Agency is authorized to contract with third party verifiers to 17accomplish this requirement.18    All information gathered by or provided to the Agency or 19contractors of the Agency, either by credit generators, 20deficit generators or on-farm credit generators, agents of 21credit generators, deficit generators, or on-farm credit 22generators used in a registered fuel pathway, through either 23voluntary disclosure or audit, must not be shared by the 24Agency with any party except in relation to the limited and 25fully disclosed administration of the clean transportation 26standard absent written consent by credit generators, deficit   SB3693- 27 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1generators, or on-farm credit generators and the entity from 2which the data was gathered. This data must not be used for any 3purpose outside of the administration and enforcement of the 4clean transportation standard except by written consent from 5the original data holder. Information provided under this 6subsection shall be exempt under subsection (b) of subsection 7(1) of Section 7 of the Freedom of Information Act. Ownership 8of all data shared or collected by the Agency for the 9administration and enforcement of the clean transportation 10standard is retained with the entity from which the data 11originates. Data protected under this subparagraph does not 12include a credit generator's, deficit generator's, or on-farm 13credit generator's credit or deficit balance, which may be 14publicly disclosed by the Agency.15    (d) Deficit generators who fail to offset their deficits 16at the conclusion of any compliance period administered by the 17Agency shall be subject to a civil penalty established by the 18Agency subject to the following limitations:19        (1) the value of the penalty shall correspond to the 20    amount of deficits attributed to a given deficit generator 21    at the time the transaction has completed; and 22        (2) for every one deficit the deficit generator fails 23    to offset, the penalty for failure to offset that deficit 24    shall not exceed 10 times the value of the credit needed to 25    offset the deficit.26    (e) Credit generators, deficit generators, or on-farm   SB3693- 28 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1credit generators that submit false information in support of 2an application to register for the clean transportation 3standard, share false information during an audit or in 4support of an attestation, or otherwise share false or 5inaccurate information to the Agency or a contractor working 6under the direction of the Agency shall be subject to 7penalties to be determined by the Agency by rule. Penalties 8under this subsection may include monetary penalties, 9forfeiture of credits, and reversals of prohibited 10transactions. The Agency may waive penalties under this 11subparagraph. In determining whether penalties should be 12applied and, if a penalty is to be applied, the amount of 13penalties to be levied for violations under this subsection, 14the Agency shall consider:15        (1) evidence of willfulness by the credit generator, 16    deficit generator, or on-farm credit generator to submit 17    false information; 18        (2) the scope of the false information;19        (3) evidence of past submissions of false information; 20    and 21        (4) efforts undertaken by the credit generator, 22    deficit generator, or on-farm credit generator to remedy 23    the false submission.24    If the violator under this subsection is a credit 25generator, following 3 violations, the Agency may remove the 26violating credit generator from the clean transportation   SB3693- 29 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1standard.2    (f) The penalties provided for in this Section may be 3recovered in a civil action brought in the name of the people 4of the State of Illinois by the State's Attorney of the county 5in which the violation occurred or by the Attorney General. 6Any penalties collected under this Section in an action in 7which the Attorney General has prevailed shall be used to 8offset registration fees in support of the administration of 9the clean transportation standards. Any amount of penalties 10collected in addition to the amount needed to administer the 11clean transportation standards shall be deposited into the 12Environmental Protection Trust Fund, to be used in accordance 13with the provisions of the Environmental Protection Trust Fund 14Act. 15    (g) The Attorney General or the State's Attorney of a 16county in which a violation occurs may institute a civil 17action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to 18restrain violations of this Act or to require such actions as 19may be necessary to address violations of this Act.20    (h) The penalties and injunctions provided in this Act are 21in addition to any penalties, injunctions, or other relief 22provided under any other law. Nothing in this Act bars an 23action by the State for any other penalty, injunction, or 24other relief provided by any other law. 25    Section 30. Life cycle carbon intensity calculations;   SB3693- 30 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1software. The life cycle carbon intensity calculation 2conducted by the Agency under paragraph (2) of Section 20 and 3subsection (b) of Section 25 shall use the Argonne National 4Laboratory's GREET model and shall include all stages of fuel 5and feedstock production and distribution, from feedstock 6generation or extraction through the distribution, delivery, 7and use of the finished fuel by the ultimate consumer. The 8Agency shall use the most recent model available. Carbon 9intensity values calculated for clean fuel pathways under 10construction or in operation using the current version of the 11GREET model shall be allowed if the GREET model is revised 12during the compliance year. In calculating the life cycle 13carbon intensity, the mass values for all greenhouse gases 14that are not carbon dioxide must be adjusted to account for 15each of their relative global warming potentials. This 16adjustment shall be performed using the global warming 17potential deemed most accurate by the Agency for each 18greenhouse gas for the period during which reductions in 19greenhouse gas emissions are to be attained under the clean 20transportation standard. When measuring the carbon intensity 21of clean fuels, the Agency shall use the GREET model's 22Feedstock Carbon Intensity Calculator (FD-CIC) for the 23purposes of accounting for variations in farming practices 24across different fuel pathways. 25    Section 35. Investments by backstop aggregators and   SB3693- 31 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1utilities. In implementing this Act, the Agency and the Board 2shall establish rules directing participating utilities and 3backstop aggregators under the standard to invest all revenue 4earned from trading credits toward investments into 5distribution, grid modernization, infrastructure and other 6projects that support transportation decarbonization, with at 7least 50% of such revenues supporting environmental justice 8communities as defined in Section 801-10 of the Illinois 9Finance Authority Act. All labor paid for with money from 10required investments under this Section shall be subject to 11the prevailing wage. The Agency and Board shall determine 12projects and goals under this Act in consultation with 13relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, credit 14generators, affected communities, and environmental justice 15advocacy organizations. 16    Section 40. Exemptions. The following fuels are exempt 17from the clean transportation standard established in Section 1815:19        (1) aviation fuels;20        (2) transportation fuel used in locomotives;21        (3) transportation fuel used in ocean-going vessels; 22    and23        (4) fuel used in military tactical vehicles and 24    tactical support equipment owned by the U.S. Department of 25    Defense or the U.S. military services.  SB3693- 32 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1However, providers of these fuels, if deemed to be clean 2fuels, shall be eligible under the rules adopted pursuant to 3this Act to receive credits on an opt-in basis that may be 4applied to future obligations or sold to deficit generators. 5    Section 45. Agency reporting obligation. Within 12 months 6after the implementation period for the clean transportation 7standard and every 2 years thereafter, the Agency shall submit 8a report to the General Assembly detailing the implementation 9of the clean transportation standard, the reductions in 10greenhouse gas emissions that have been achieved through the 11clean transportation standard, and targets for future 12reductions in greenhouse gas emissions. These reports shall 13include feedback solicited from stakeholders under paragraph 14(7) of subsection (a) of Section 20. 15    Section 50. Fuel supply forecasting. In consultation with 16the Department of Transportation and the Department of 17Agriculture, the Agency must develop a periodic fuel supply 18forecast to project the availability of fuels to the State 19necessary for compliance with clean transportation standard 20requirements. The fuel supply forecast for each upcoming 21compliance period must include, but is not limited to, the 22following:23        (1) an estimate of the potential volumes of gasoline, 24    gasoline substitutes, and gasoline alternatives, and   SB3693- 33 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1    diesel, diesel substitutes, and diesel alternatives 2    available to the State. In developing this estimate, the 3    Agency must consider, but is not limited to, considering: 4            (A) the existing and future vehicle fleet in this 5        State; and 6            (B) any constraints that might be preventing 7        access to available and cost-effective clean fuels by 8        the State, such as geographic and logistical factors, 9        and alleviating factors to the constraints;10        (2) an estimate of the total banked credits and 11    carried over deficits held by deficient generators, credit 12    generators, on-farm credit generators, and credit 13    aggregators at the beginning of the compliance period, and 14    an estimate of the total credits attributable to fuels 15    described in paragraph (1);16        (3) an estimate of the number of credits needed to 17    meet the applicable clean transportation standard 18    requirements during the forecasted compliance period; and 19        (4) a comparison in the estimates of paragraphs (1) 20    and (2) with the estimate in paragraph (3), for the 21    purpose of indicating the availability of fuels and banked 22    credits needed for compliance with the requirements of 23    this chapter.24    The Agency may appoint a forecast review team of relevant 25experts to participate in the fuel supply forecast or 26examination of data required by this Section. The Agency must   SB3693- 34 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1finalize a fuel supply forecast for an upcoming compliance 2period by no later than 90 days prior to the start of the 3compliance period.  4    Section 55. Forecast deferral.5    (a) No later than 30 calendar days before the commencement 6of a compliance period, the Agency shall issue an order 7declaring a forecast deferral if the fuel supply forecast 8under Section 50 projects that the amount of credits that will 9be available during the forecast compliance period will be 10less than 100% of the credits projected to be necessary for 11regulated parties to comply with the scheduled applicable 12clean transportation standard adopted by the Agency for the 13forecast compliance period. 14    (b) An order declaring a forecast deferral under this 15Section must set forth:16        (1) the duration of the forecast deferral;17        (2) the types of fuel to which the forecast deferral 18    applies; and19        (3) which of the following methods the Agency has 20    selected for deferring compliance with the scheduled 21    applicable clean transportation standard during the 22    forecast deferral:23            (A) temporarily adjusting the scheduled applicable 24        clean transportation standards to a standard 25        identified in the order that better reflects the   SB3693- 35 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1        forecast availability of credits during the forecast 2        compliance period and requiring deficit generators to 3        comply with the temporary standard;4            (B) requiring deficit generators to comply only 5        with the clean transportation standard applicable 6        during the compliance period prior to the forecast 7        compliance period; or8            (C) suspending deficit accrual for part or all of 9        the forecast deferral period.10    (c) In implementing a forecast deferral, the Agency may 11take an action for deferring compliance with the clean 12transportation standard other than, or in addition to, 13selecting a method under paragraph (3) of subsection (b) only 14if the Agency determines that none of the methods under 15paragraph (3) of subsection (b) will provide a sufficient 16mechanism for containing the costs of compliance with the 17clean transportation standard during the forecast deferral.18    (d) If the Agency makes the determination specified in 19subsection (c), the Agency shall:20        (1) include in the order declaring a forecast deferral 21    the determination and the action to be taken; and 22        (2) provide written notification and justification of 23    the determination and the action to:24            (A) the Governor;25            (B) the President of the Senate;26            (C) the Speaker of the House of Representatives;  SB3693- 36 -LRB104 19890 LNS 33340 b1            (D) the Minority Leader of the Senate; and2            (E) the Minority Leader of the House of 3        Representatives.4    (e) The duration of a forecast deferral may not be less 5than one calendar quarter or longer than one compliance 6period. Only the Agency may terminate, by order, a forecast 7deferral before the expiration date of the forecast deferral. 8Termination of a forecast deferral is effective on the first 9day of the next calendar quarter after the date that the order 10declaring the termination is adopted. 11    Section 60. Conflicts with other State programs. Nothing 12in this Act precludes the Agency or Board from adopting or 13maintaining other programs as permitted or required by 14existing or future legislation to reduce greenhouse gas 15emissions from the transportation sector. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2027.